North Dakota, session 69, SB2145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 32-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Behavior health instruction - Immunity from civil liability.
1. A person employed or contracted to provide a behavior health service, or any other service,
through the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline, 211 information and referral helpline, or 911 system
is not liable for any civil damages arising from providing the service to any individual unless
the service provided constitutes willful and wanton misconduct or gross negligence.
2. This section does not waive, limit, or modify any existing immunity or other defense of the
state or any political subdivision, or any of its agencies, departments, or employees, nor does
it create any claim for relief against any of these entities.

S. B. NO. 2145 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2145.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State